Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-896 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Providers' Bill
of Rights Act of 2026".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-896.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each assisted living facility shall post the Providers' Bill
of Rights in a prominent location within the facility.
Req. No. 16453 Page 1

B. The Providers' Bill of Rights shall provide, consistent with
state and federal laws and rules promulgated pursuant to the
Continuum of Care Act, the right to:
1. Assurance that nothing in the Providers' Bill of Rights
shall be construed to diminish, impair, or conflict with resident
rights established under state or federal law, including but not
limited to the Resident Bill of Rights set forth in Section 1-1918
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Be treated in a professional manner consistent with
applicable contractual, regulatory, and licensing standards;
3. Terminate a resident’s contract immediately when a licensed
medical professional determination or documented incident
demonstrates that continued placement presents an imminent threat to
the health or safety of the resident or other residents, consistent
with discharge and transfer requirements established by rule;
provided, the facility shall comply with all notice, documentation,
and appeal protections required under OAC 310:663-3-5;
4. Present grievances, file complaints, or provide information
to governmental agencies without retaliation as prohibited by law;
5. Decline to provide services that are outside the scope of
services agreed to in the resident contract or outside the
facility’s licensed level of care, unless otherwise required by law
or necessitated by emergency circumstances;

Req. No. 16453 Page 2

6. Enter into lawful agreements with third-party service
providers to support resident independence and services, consistent
with resident choice, facility policy, and applicable regulatory
requirements;
7. Request and obtain records reasonably necessary to determine
appropriate placement and care needs of a prospective or current
resident, subject to applicable privacy, consent, and
confidentiality laws;
8. Decline admission or continued placement when a prospective
or current resident’s needs exceed the facility’s licensed scope of
care, staffing capabilities, or physical environment, as documented
through the facility’s assessment process;
9. Decline to disclose resident information to third parties
except as authorized by the resident or as required by state or
federal law;
10. Establish and enforce policies governing the possession of
weapons and unlawful drugs within the facility in accordance with
state law and facility safety policies;
11. Receive known and legally shareable information regarding
behaviors or conditions that may impact the safety of residents or
staff, when such information is available and permitted by law; and
12. Be notified when a resident has arranged for third-party
personal service providers within the facility when such services
may affect facility operations, safety, or regulatory compliance.
Req. No. 16453 Page 3

C. Facilities shall continue to prominently post the Resident
Bill of Rights as required by Section 1-1918 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16453 TJ 02/17/26


















Req. No. 16453 Page 4